Illinois, session 104th, SB1465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3-202.05 and 3-209 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/3-202.05)7    Sec. 3-202.05. Staffing ratios effective July 1, 2010 and 8thereafter.9    (a) For the purpose of computing staff to resident ratios, 10direct care staff shall include:11        (1) registered nurses;12        (2) licensed practical nurses;13        (3) certified nurse assistants;14        (4) psychiatric services rehabilitation aides;15        (5) rehabilitation and therapy aides;16        (6) psychiatric services rehabilitation coordinators;17        (7) assistant directors of nursing;18        (8) 50% of the Director of Nurses' time; and19        (9) 30% of the Social Services Directors' time; .20        (10) infection preventionists;21        (11) minimum data set assessment nurses;22        (12) other social workers;23        (13) certified nursing assistant interns; and  SB1465- 2 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1        (14) medication aides. 2    Except as otherwise provided by law, 100% of the hours 3worked by the staff listed in this subsection shall be counted 4toward the staff to resident ratio. The Department shall, by 5rule, allow certain facilities subject to 77 Ill. Adm. Code 6300.4000 and following (Subpart S) to utilize specialized 7clinical staff, as defined in rules, to count towards the 8staffing ratios. 9    Within 120 days of June 14, 2012 (the effective date of 10Public Act 97-689), the Department shall promulgate rules 11specific to the staffing requirements for facilities federally 12defined as Institutions for Mental Disease. These rules shall 13recognize the unique nature of individuals with chronic mental 14health conditions, shall include minimum requirements for 15specialized clinical staff, including clinical social workers, 16psychiatrists, psychologists, and direct care staff set forth 17in paragraphs (4) through (6) and any other specialized staff 18which may be utilized and deemed necessary to count toward 19staffing ratios. 20    Within 120 days of June 14, 2012 (the effective date of 21Public Act 97-689), the Department shall promulgate rules 22specific to the staffing requirements for facilities licensed 23under the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 242013. These rules shall recognize the unique nature of 25individuals with chronic mental health conditions, shall 26include minimum requirements for specialized clinical staff,   SB1465- 3 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1including clinical social workers, psychiatrists, 2psychologists, and direct care staff set forth in paragraphs 3(4) through (6) and any other specialized staff which may be 4utilized and deemed necessary to count toward staffing ratios. 5    (b) (Blank).6    (b-5) For purposes of the minimum staffing ratios in this 7Section, all residents shall be classified as requiring either 8skilled care or intermediate care. 9    As used in this subsection:10    "Intermediate care" means basic nursing care and other 11restorative services under periodic medical direction.12    "Skilled care" means skilled nursing care, continuous 13skilled nursing observations, restorative nursing, and other 14services under professional direction with frequent medical 15supervision. 16    (c) Facilities shall notify the Department within 60 days 17after July 29, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 1896-1372), in a form and manner prescribed by the Department, 19of the staffing ratios in effect on July 29, 2010 (the 20effective date of Public Act 96-1372) for both intermediate 21and skilled care and the number of residents receiving each 22level of care. 23    (d)(1) (Blank).24    (2) (Blank).25    (3) (Blank).26    (4) (Blank).  SB1465- 4 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1    (5) Effective January 1, 2014, the minimum staffing ratios 2shall be increased to 3.8 hours of nursing and personal care 3each day for a resident needing skilled care and 2.5 hours of 4nursing and personal care each day for a resident needing 5intermediate care. 6    (e) Ninety days after June 14, 2012 (the effective date of 7Public Act 97-689), a minimum of 25% of nursing and personal 8care time shall be provided by licensed nurses, with at least 910% of nursing and personal care time provided by registered 10nurses. These minimum requirements shall remain in effect 11until an acuity based registered nurse requirement is 12promulgated by rule concurrent with the adoption of the 13Resource Utilization Group classification-based payment 14methodology, as provided in Section 5-5.2 of the Illinois 15Public Aid Code. Registered nurses and licensed practical 16nurses employed by a facility in excess of these requirements 17may be used to satisfy the remaining 75% of the nursing and 18personal care time requirements. Notwithstanding this 19subsection, no staffing requirement in statute in effect on 20June 14, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-689) shall 21be reduced on account of this subsection. 22    (f) The Department shall submit proposed rules for 23adoption by January 1, 2020 establishing a system for 24determining compliance with minimum staffing set forth in this 25Section and the requirements of 77 Ill. Adm. Code 300.1230 26adjusted for any waivers granted under Section 3-303.1.   SB1465- 5 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1Compliance shall be determined quarterly by comparing the 2number of hours provided per resident per day using the 3Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' payroll-based 4journal and the facility's daily census, broken down by 5intermediate and skilled care as self-reported by the facility 6to the Department on a quarterly basis. The Department shall 7use the quarterly payroll-based journal and the self-reported 8census to calculate the number of hours provided per resident 9per day and compare this ratio to the minimum staffing 10standards required under this Section, as impacted by any 11waivers granted under Section 3-303.1. Discrepancies between 12job titles contained in this Section and the payroll-based 13journal shall be addressed by rule. The manner in which the 14Department requests payroll-based journal information to be 15submitted shall align with the federal Centers for Medicare 16and Medicaid Services' requirements that allow providers to 17submit the quarterly data in an aggregate manner. 18    (g) Monetary penalties for non-compliance. The Department 19shall submit proposed rules for adoption by January 1, 2020 20establishing monetary penalties for facilities not in 21compliance with minimum staffing standards under this Section. 22Facilities shall be required to comply with the provisions of 23this subsection beginning January 1, 2025. No monetary penalty 24may be issued for noncompliance prior to the revised 25implementation date, which shall be January 1, 2025. If a 26facility is found to be noncompliant prior to the revised   SB1465- 6 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1implementation date, the Department shall provide a written 2notice identifying the staffing deficiencies and require the 3facility to provide a sufficiently detailed correction plan 4that describes proposed and completed actions the facility 5will take or has taken, including hiring actions, to address 6the facility's failure to meet the statutory minimum staffing 7levels. Monetary penalties shall be imposed beginning no later 8than July 1, 2025, based on data for the quarter beginning 9January 1, 2025 through March 31, 2025 and quarterly 10thereafter. Monetary penalties shall be established based on a 11formula that calculates on a daily basis the cost of wages and 12benefits for the missing staffing hours. All notices of 13noncompliance shall include the computations used to determine 14noncompliance and establishing the variance between minimum 15staffing ratios and the Department's computations. No monetary 16penalties shall be imposed unless the variance between a 17facility's minimum staffing ratios and the Department's 18computations exceeds 20%. The penalty for the first offense 19shall be 125% of the cost of wages and benefits for the missing 20staffing hours. The penalty shall increase to 150% of the cost 21of wages and benefits for the missing staffing hours for the 22second offense and 200% the cost of wages and benefits for the 23missing staffing hours for the third and all subsequent 24offenses. The penalty shall be imposed regardless of whether 25the facility has committed other violations of this Act during 26the same period that the staffing offense occurred. The   SB1465- 7 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1penalty may not be waived, but the Department shall have the 2discretion to determine the gravity of the violation in 3situations where there is no more than a 10% deviation from the 4staffing requirements and make appropriate adjustments to the 5penalty. The Department is granted discretion to waive the 6penalty when unforeseen circumstances have occurred that 7resulted in call-offs of scheduled staff. This provision shall 8be applied no more than 6 times per quarter. Nothing in this 9Section diminishes a facility's right to appeal the imposition 10of a monetary penalty. No facility may appeal a notice of 11noncompliance issued during the revised implementation period. 12(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 13102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.) 14    (210 ILCS 45/3-209)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4153-209)15    Sec. 3-209. Required posting of information. 16    (a) Every facility shall conspicuously post for display in 17an area of its offices accessible to residents, employees, and 18visitors the following:19        (1) Its current license;20        (2) A description, provided by the Department, of 21    complaint procedures established under this Act and the 22    name, address, and telephone number of a person authorized 23    by the Department to receive complaints;24        (3) A copy of any order pertaining to the facility 25    issued by the Department or a court;  SB1465- 8 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1        (4) A list of the material available for public 2    inspection under Section 3-210;3        (5) Phone numbers and websites for rights protection 4    services must be posted in common areas and at the main 5    entrance and provided upon entry and at the request of 6    residents or the resident's representative in accordance 7    with 42 CFR 483.10(j)(4); and8        (6) The statement "The Illinois Long-Term Care 9    Ombudsman Program is a free resident advocacy service 10    available to the public.".11    In accordance with F574 of the State Operations Manual for 12Long-Term Care Facilities, the administrator shall post for 13all residents and at the main entrance the name, address, and 14telephone number of the appropriate State governmental office 15where complaints may be lodged in language the resident can 16understand, which must include notice of the grievance 17procedure of the facility or program as well as addresses and 18phone numbers for the Office of Health Care Regulation and the 19Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and a website showing the 20information of a facility's ownership. The facility shall 21include a link to the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program's 22website on the home page of the facility's website. 23    (b) A facility that has received a notice of violation for 24a violation with a variance that exceeds 20% of the minimum 25staffing requirements under Section 3-202.05 shall display, 26during the period of time the facility is out of compliance, a   SB1465- 9 -LRB104 08274 BAB 18324 b1notice stating in Calibri (body) font and 26-point type in 2black letters on an 8.5 by 11 inch white paper the following:  3"Notice Dated: ...................4Last quarter, this This facility did not does not currently 5meet the minimum staffing ratios required by law. Posted at 6the direction of the Illinois Department of Public Health.".  7The notice must be posted, at a minimum, at all publicly used 8exterior entryways into the facility, inside the main entrance 9lobby, and next to any registration desk for easily accessible 10viewing. The notice must also be posted on the main page of the 11facility's website. The Department shall have the discretion 12to determine the gravity of any violation and, taking into 13account mitigating and aggravating circumstances and facts, 14may reduce the requirement of, and amount of time for, posting 15the notice. 16(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 102-1080, eff. 1-1-23.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.